Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB723.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6334.1(4) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 6334.1. Responsibility for investigation.The department shall establish procedures regarding the following different responses to address suspected child abuse and protective services depending on the person's allegedly committing the suspected child abuse or causing a child to be in need of protective services:* * *(4) If a child is alleged to be in need of other protective services, the appropriate county agency, 1234567891011121314151617181920 department employees under paragraph (5) or the contracted private agency shall assess the needs of the child as provided in this chapter.(5) If the department determines that a county agency is not investigating cases in a timely manner, or the county agency requests assistance from the department, the department shall have the authority to assist in the investigations. The county agency shall designate the general protective services cases that are to be investigated by the department. The department employees working on those cases shall possess the same qualifications and credentials necessary for county agency personnel to handle investigations. Department employees shall possess the same authority to interview witnesses and the child. All regulations covering the confidentiality of investigations shall apply to the investigations handled by the department, as well as any final determination of the case.(6) The department may form a task force consisting of department and county agency employees dedicated to investigating cases it receives under paragraph (5). The task force may be temporary and may be disbanded when the department investigation of the designated cases is complete.(7) The department may authorize the county agency to contract with a private agency to investigate cases that the department receives under paragraph (5). The private agency must be subject to the requirements of 55 Pa. Code Ch. 3680 (relating to administration and operation of a children and youth social service agency).(8) The department employees who assist county agencies shall first work with the county agency personnel to 20250SB0723PN0738 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determine which cases require general protective services and those which require child protective services. The department employees or contracted private agency may then handle the cases that require general protective services in consultation with the county agency. If the department's work on those cases is finished or if there are no general protective cases that the agency needs assistance with, the department may assist in cases that require child protective services.Section 2. Section 6362(a) of Title 23 is amended to read:§ 6362. Responsibilities of county agency for child protective services.(a) General rule.--[The] Except as provided under section 6334.1(5) (relating to responsibility for investigation), the county agency shall be the sole civil agency responsible for receiving and investigating all reports of child abuse made pursuant to this chapter, specifically including, but not limited to, reports of child abuse in facilities operated by the department and other public agencies, for the purpose of providing protective services to prevent further abuses to children and to provide or arrange for and monitor the provision of those services necessary to safeguard and ensure the well-being and development of the child and to preserve and stabilize family life wherever appropriate.* * *Section 3. Section 6375(a), (b) and (d) of Title 23 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6375. County agency requirements for general protective services.20250SB0723PN0738 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Duties of county agency.--The county agency shall make available a program of general protective services within each agency. The county agency or contracted private agency shall perform those functions assigned by this chapter and others that would further the purposes of this chapter. It shall have sufficient staff of sufficient qualifications to fulfill the purposes of this chapter and be organized in a way as to maximize the continuity of responsibility, care and service of individual workers toward individual children and families. The department by regulation shall set forth staff-to-family ratios for the receipt and assessment of reports of children in need of protective services and for the provision of services to neglected children and their families. Each contracted private agency personnel shall be required to meet all of the same standards as county agency personnel when assessing referrals, conducting investigations and providing services.(b) Organization of county agency.--Each county agency or a contracted private agency shall be organized and staffed to ensure that the agency can provide intake for general protective services. Intake occurs when a report or referral is made to the agency or when a parent or person responsible for the child's welfare requests the assistance of the agency.* * *(d) Receiving and assessing reports.--The county agency [shall be the sole civil agency responsible for receiving and assessing all] may contract with a private agency to receive and assess reports of children in need of protective services made pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of providing protective services to prevent abuse or neglect to children and to provide or arrange for and monitor the provision of those services 20250SB0723PN0738 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary to safeguard and ensure the child's well-being and development and to preserve and stabilize family life wherever appropriate. The department may waive the receipt and assessment requirement pursuant to section 6361 (relating to organization for child protective services). Nothing in this subsection limits 42 Pa.C.S. § 6304 (relating to powers and duties of probation officers).* * *(p) Immunity.--If a county agency contracts with a private agency for purposes of accessing reports alleging a need for general protective services, the contracted private agency, its officers, governing board members and employees, acting within the scope of their contracted responsibilities, shall receive the same immunity available to local agencies as outlined in 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 Subch. C (relating to actions against local parties).Section 4. Section 6378 of Title 23 is amended to read:§ 6378. Purchase of services.[Except for the receipt and assessment of reports alleging a need for protective services, the] The county agency may purchase and utilize the services of any appropriate public or private agency. The department shall promulgate regulations establishing standards and qualifications of persons or agencies providing services for a county agency. The department may, by regulation, provide for the establishment of regional facilities or a regional coordination of licensed professional service providers to provide county agencies with access to licensed physicians and psychologists, as required by this section.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0723PN0738 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829